Tennessee, session 114, SB2248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-104(c), is amended by deleting
"During emergency conditions, the agency and director shall report" and substituting "During
emergency conditions, the agency and director shall report in writing, in addition to any other
means,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2248
012434
- 1 -